Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202484-934
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Occupational Board Reform Act, the definitions in sections 84-935 to 84-944.01 apply.

Laws 2018, LB299, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB16, § 5.
July 19, 2024